Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.068

Lost or destroyed warrants, instruments, or other evidence of indebtedness—Records to be kept—Cancellation of originals—Notice.

The state treasurer or other issuing officer shall keep a full and complete record of all warrants, bonds or other instruments alleged to have been lost or destroyed, which were issued by such agency, and of the issue of any duplicate therefor; and upon the issuance of any duplicate, the officer shall enter upon his or her books the cancellation of the original instrument and immediately notify the state treasurer, the state auditor, and all trustees and paying agents authorized to redeem such instruments on behalf of the state of Washington, of such cancellation.

[ 2018 c 35 s 1; 2009 c 549 s 5038; 1965 ex.s. c 61 s 3; 1965 c 8 s 43.08.068. Prior: 1890 p 640 s 17; RRS s 11012; prior: 1888 p 236 s 3. Formerly RCW 43.09.130.]